Hawaii, session 2026, GM1261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that certain tax
expenditures should be evaluated annually to determine whether
they are efficiently fulfilling their intended purpose.
Once enacted, these provisions often remain in place for
years with limited reassessment. Periodic review and evaluation
of tax expenditures is essential to ensure they remain
effective, fair, and aligned with evolving public priorities.
Regular evaluation strengthens accountability, supports sound
budget decisions, ensures equitable competition, and ultimately
maximizes benefits for taxpayers.
The legislature further finds that income tax credits and
general excise and use tax exemptions represent a form of public
spending, even though they appear as reduced revenue rather than
direct expenditures. Without systematic evaluation,
policymakers and the public may lack clear insight, or even hard
data, that can show how public resources are being used and
whether anticipated outcomes are being achieved.
2026-3378 HB2429 GDI HMSO
liniBiHHHiam

| ।
l
Page 2 HII .B. NO. 2429
HD2
C.D. 1
Especially in this uncertain economic climate, there is
constant pressure to allocate limited resources among competing
needs, such as education, health care, infrastructure, and
public safety. Tax expenditures that were justified under past
economic or social conditions may no longer reflect current
priorities. Reviewing these provisions allows lawmakers to
determine whether funds tied up in tax incentives could be
better directed elsewhere or whether successful programs merit
continued or expanded support. Periodic evaluation helps to
align tax incentives with current budget priorities.
The legislature believes that effective tax policy should
be guided by data, rather than assumptions. Periodic reviews
allow for the measurement of outcomes, such as job creation,
economic growth, investment levels, or targeted social benefits,
relative to the cost of the incentive. When returns are clearly
defined and measured, policymakers can distinguish between
programs that deliver strong value and those that fall short.
The legislature recognizes that regular review can
determine if initial objectives have been achieved. Some tax
expenditures are enacted with specific goals, such as
encouraging renewable energy development, revitalizing
2026-3378 HB2429 GDI HMSO 2
luiiiiHiiiMiiiiiinm

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
distressed communities, or supporting research and development.
Over time, circumstances may change or goals may be met.
Periodic review can provide the data that can point to whether a
credit or exemption should be continued, modified, phased out,
or replaced with a more effective approach. A tax expenditure
that made sense decades ago may no longer be relevant or
efficient today. Periodic evaluation ensures that tax policy
adapts to changing realities and necessary adjustments are made
to maintain effectiveness and fairness.
Most importantly, regular review provides better data for
long-term oversight. Collecting and analyzing consistent
information on tax expenditures improves legislative oversight
and policy design. High-quality data enables evidence-based
decision-making, reduces reliance on anecdotal claims, and
strengthens the overall integrity of the tax system.
The legislature also recognizes that one possible benefit
of regular review is ensuring equitable competition among key
industry sectors. Long-standing tax expenditures can
unintentionally favor certain industries or firms, creating
market distortions and competitive imbalances. Periodic review
helps determine whether incentives continue to serve a
2026-3378 HB2429 CDl HMSO
lililiiiiiHnimiiiHMHi

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
legitimate public purpose or whether they provide unfair
advantages that hinder innovation and competition. A level
playing field encourages efficiency and economic resilience
across sectors.
Additionally, from the taxpayer’s perspective, periodic
evaluation helps identify tangible benefits. Taxpayers deserve
assurance that foregone revenue translates into public value,
such as economic opportunity, improved services, or long-term
fiscal stability.
The legislature notes that the periodic review and
evaluation of tax expenditures is not merely a best practice,
but a necessity for responsible fiscal management. By promoting
accountability, aligning incentives with budget priorities,
measuring returns, ensuring fair competition, and adapting to
change, government can ensure that tax policies serve their
intended purpose and deliver meaningful value to taxpayers.
Regular evaluation strengthens public trust and helps build a
more effective, equitable, and sustainable tax system. Periodic
evaluations can clarify whether tax incentives truly benefit the
broader public or primarily serve narrow interests.
2026-3378 HB2429 CDl HMSO

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to facilitate tax
reviews and the State's evaluation of tax policies by:
(1) Requiring the department of business, economic
development, and tourism, in collaboration with the
department of taxation, to study the effectiveness of
tax expenditures, prepare summary descriptive
statistics, submit annual reports to the legislature,
and develop appropriate schedules and tax return forms
to collect adequate information for evaluation of tax
expenditures; and
(2) Authorizing department of business, economic
development, and tourism staff to access certain
information on tax returns to conduct evaluations of
tax expenditures.
SECTION 2. Chapter 201, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§201- Evaluation of tax expenditures. (a) The
department, in collaboration with the department of taxation,
shall study the effectiveness of tax expenditures and prepare
summary descriptive statistics. The department shall submit a
2026-3378 HB2429 CDl HMSO 5
■■■■HnniiHwiiin

Page 6
H.B. NO. <
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
report on the information required under this section to the
legislature by September 1 of each year.
(b) The department, in collaboration with the department
of taxation, shall develop the appropriate schedules and tax
return forms to collect adequate information for the evaluation
of tax expenditures."
SECTION 3. Section 235-116, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as' follows:
"§235-116 Disclosure of returns unlawful; penalty. All
tax returns and return information required to be filed under
this chapter shall be confidential, including any copy of any
portion of a federal return that may be attached to a state tax
return, or any information reflected in the copy of the federal
return. It shall be unlawful for any person, or any officer or
employee of the State, including the auditor or the auditor's
agent with regard to tax return information obtained pursuant to
section 23-5(a), to make known intentionally information
imparted by any income tax return or estimate made under
sections 235-92, 235-94, 235-95, and 235-97 or wilfully to
permit any income tax return or estimate so made or copy thereof
to be seen or examined by any person other than
2026-3378 HB2429 CDl HMSO 6

Page 7
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) The taxpayer or the taxpayer's authorized agent[—
poroono]£
(2) Persons duly authorized by the State in connection
with their official duties, [the] including staff of
the department of business, economic development, and
tourism conducting an evaluation of tax expenditures
pursuant to section 201- ; or
(3) The Multistate Tax Commission or the authorized
representative thereof,
except as otherwise provided by law. Any offense against the
foregoing provisions shall be punishable as a class C felony."
SECTION 4. Section 237-34, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) All tax returns and return information required to be
filed under this chapter, and the report of any investigation of
the return or of the subject matter of the return, shall be
confidential. It shall be unlawful for any person or any
officer or employee of the State, including the auditor or the
auditor's agent with regard to tax return information obtained
pursuant to section 23-5 (a), to intentionally make known
information imparted by any tax return or return information
2026-3378 HB2429 CDl HMSO

Page 8 2429
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
filed pursuant to this chapter, or any report of any
investigation of the return or of the subject matter of the
return, or to wilfully permit any return, return information, or
report so made, or any copy thereof, to be seen or examined by
any person; provided that for tax purposes only, the taxpayer,
the taxpayer's authorized agent, or persons with a material
interest in the return, return information, or report may
examine them. Unless otherwise provided by law, persons with a
material interest in the return, return information, or report
shall include:
(1) Trustees;
(2) Partners;
(3) Persons named in a board resolution or a one per cent
shareholder in the case of a corporate return;
(4) The person authorized to act for a corporation in
dissolution;
(5) The shareholder of an S corporation;
(6) The personal representative, trustee, heir, or
beneficiary of an estate or trust in the case of the
estate's or decedent's return;
2026-3378 HB2429 GDI HMSO 8
iiioDiiHiiMiiiiiiHnniiin

Page 9 2429
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(7) The committee, trustee, or guardian of any person in
paragraphs (1) through (6) who is incompetent;
(8) The trustee in bankruptcy or receiver, and the
attorney-in-fact of any person in paragraphs (1)
through (7);
(9) Persons duly authorized by the State in connection
with their official duties [-^] , including staff of the
department of business, economic development, and
tourism conducting an evaluation of tax expenditures
pursuant to section 201- ;
(10) Any duly accredited tax official of the United States
or of any state or territory;
(11) The Multistate Tax Commission or its authorized
representative;
(12) Members of a limited liability company; and
(13) A person contractually obligated to pay the taxes
assessed against another when the latter person is
under audit by the department.
Any violation of this subsection shall be a class C
felony. ’’
2026-3378 HB2429 CDl HMSO 9

Page 10
H.B. NO.
C.D, 1
SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026, and
shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026.
2026-3378 HB2429 CDl HMSO 10
iiiniiiiiiiiiiiiniiiiin

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 25th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2429, HD 2, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
-------
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2429, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
185-26